Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.270

Transmittal of total of public employees' retirement system members' deductions.

The person responsible for making up the payroll shall transmit promptly to the department at the end of each and every payroll period a copy of the original payroll voucher or any other payroll report as the department may require showing thereon all deductions for the public employees' retirement system made from the compensation earnable of each member, together with warrants or checks covering the total of the deductions. The department after making a record of all receipts shall pay them to the state treasurer for use according to the provisions of chapter 41.40 RCW.

[ 1991 c 35 s 90; 1977 ex.s. c 295 s 19; 1947 c 274 s 36; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 11072-36. Formerly RCW 41.40.350.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.